pt-BR: Design de armadilha adesiva: Quadro; Tenda dobrável; Fita/tira; Folha; Bandeja; Tubo; Túnel/caixa; Outro
ro-RO: Designul capcanei cu adeziv: Planșă; Cort pliabil; Panglică/bandă; Foaie; Tavă; Tub; Tunel/Cutie; Altele
fr: Conception du piège à colle: Planche; Tente pliable; Ruban/Bande; Feuille; Plateau; Tube; Tunnel/Boîte; Autre
pt-PT: Design da armadilha de cola: Placa; Tenda dobrável; Fita/Tira; Folha; Bandeja; Tubo; Túnel/Caixa; Outro
es: Diseño de trampa adhesiva: Junta; Tienda de campaña plegable; Cinta/Tira; Hoja; Bandeja; Tubo; Túnel/Caja; Otros
hr-HR: Dizajn zamke s ljepilom: Ploča; Sklopivi šator; Vrpca/traka; Sheet; Pladanj; Cijev; Tunel/kutija; Ostalo
it: Progettazione della trappola con colla: Asse; Tenda pieghevole; Nastro/striscia; Foglio; Vassoio; Tubo; Tunnel/Scatola; Altro
el: Σχεδιασμός παγίδας με κόλλα: Επιφάνεια (Board); Πτυσσόμενη σκηνή; Ταινία/Λωρίδα; Φύλλο; Δίσκος; Σωληνωτή; Τούνελ/Κουτί; Άλλο
sl-SI: Zasnova lepilne pasti: Odbor; Zložljiv šotor; Trak; Blago; Pladenj; Tuba; Predor/škatla; Druga
ja: 粘着トラップの設計: ボード; 折りたたみテント; リボン/ストリップ; シート; トレイ; チューブ; トンネル/ボックス; その他
bg-BG: Дизайн на капана с лепило: Дъска; Сгъваем тип „палатка“; Лента/панделка; Лист; Тава; Тръба; Тунел/Кутия; Друго
tr: Yapışkan tuzak tasarımı: Pano; Katlanabilir Tenteli; Kurdele/Şerit; Tabaka; Tepsi; Tüp; Tünel/Kutu; Diğer
sv: Design av limfälla: Platta; Hopfällbart tält; Band / remsa; Ark; Bricka; Tub; Tunnel / Låda; Övrigt
nl: Ontwerp van lijmval: Bord; Opvouwbare tent; Lint/strip; Blad; Schaaltje; Tube; Tunnel/Box; Overig
ko: 접착식 트랩 디자인: 보드; 접이식 텐트; 리본/스트립; 시트; 트레이; 튜브; 터널/박스; 기타
fi: Liima-ansan suunnittelu: Alusta; Kokoontaitettava teltta; Nauha/Suikale; Arkki; Alusta; Putkilo; Tunneli/laatikko; Muu
da: Limfældes design: Plade; Sammenklappeligt telt; Bånd/strimmel; Ark; Bakke; Tube; Tunnel/kasse; Andet
zh-CN: 粘鼠板设计: 木式; 折叠帐篷式; 丝带/条带; 板式; 托盘式; 管式; 隧道/盒式; 其他
sk-SK: Konštrukcia lepiacej pasce: Dosková; Skladací stan; Pruhová/Pásová; Hárok; Podnos; Tuba; Tunelová/škatuľová; Iné
th: การออกแบบกับดักกาว: แบบแผ่นเรียบ; แบบพับทรงเต็นท์; แบบริบบิ้น/แถบยาว; แบบแผ่น; ถาดวางของ; หลอด; แบบอุโมงค์/กล่อง; อื่นๆ
nb: Limfelledesign: Brett; Sammenleggbart telt; Bånd/stripe; Ark; Brett; Slange; Tunnel/boks; Annet
pl: Konstrukcja pułapki klejowej: Płytka; Składany namiot; Taśma / pasek; Arkusz; Tacka; Tuba; Tunel / pudełko; Pozostałe
vi: Thiết kế bẫy keo: Tấm ván; Lều gấp; Ruy băng/Dải; Tờ; Khay; Ống; Đường hầm/Hộp; Khác
hu: Ragasztócsapda kialakítása: Tábla; Összecsukható sátor; Szalag/csík; Lap; Tálca; Cső; Alagút/doboz; Egyéb
en: Glue trap design: Board; Foldable Tent; Ribbon/Strip; Sheet; Tray; Tube; Tunnel/Box; Other
de: Klebefallendesign: Planke; Faltbares Zelt; Band/Streifen; Blatt; Tablett; Rohr; Tunnel/Box; Sonstiges
cs: Konstrukce lepové pasti: Deska; Skládací do tvaru stanu; Mucholapka; Podložka; Miska; Tuba; Tunel/box; Jiné
ru: Конструкция клеевой ловушки: Доска; Складная палатка; Лента/полоса; Лист; Лоток; Трубка; Туннель/Коробка; Другое
zh-TW: 黏膠陷阱設計: 板材; 折疊式帳篷; 絲帶/條帶; 薄板; 托盤; 管狀; 隧道式/箱式; 其他
lt-LT: Klijų gaudyklės tipas: Plokštė; Sulankstoma palapinė; Kaspinas / juostelė; Lakštai; Padėklas; Vamzdis; Tunelis / dėžė; Kita